Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-410.01
Board of directors; plans; notice; hearing.

The board of directors, having first, with the aid of such engineer, surveyor, and other assistants as it may have chosen, made detailed plans of the public works to be done in accordance with section 31-401, shall cause a notice to be inserted at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district stating the time and place where the directors shall meet for the purpose of conducting a public hearing on the proposed public works and the method of financing such works. All parties interested in the proposed public works may appear at such public hearing in person or by counsel or may file written objections thereto. The directors shall then proceed to hear and consider the same and determine whether to adopt the public works in accordance with the detailed plans presented at such hearing and whether to finance such works by benefits accruing to the several tracts of land within the district or by a tax levy upon the taxable value of the taxable property in the district. The hearing may be continued from time to time upon notice given by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district stating the time and place of such continuance.

Laws 1969, c. 245, § 1, p. 896;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 129;

Laws 1984, LB 897, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 25;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 25.